Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 10. Designation of Hospitals

§ 35-2-1001.
Designation of heart attack and stroke centers.

The department of health shall establish by rule and regulation the process for recognition and designation of hospitals as any one (1) or more of the following:

Heart attack receiving centers;

Heart attack referring centers;

Comprehensive stroke centers;

Primary stroke centers;

Acute stroke ready centers.

The designation of hospitals pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall recognize those hospitals that are accredited by the society for cardiovascular patient care, the American heart association, the joint commission on the accreditation of healthcare organizations or another nationally recognized accreditation organization as determined by the department in its rules and regulations.

The department shall withdraw the designation of a hospital pursuant to subsection (a) of this section if the department determines that the hospital is not in compliance with the requirements of this section or rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this section.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations to enforce this article, which shall include all of the following:

Specific criteria for qualification pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, including identification of accrediting organizations;

Designation application procedures;

Procedures for withdrawal of a designation;

Support for the coordination among designated hospitals for the referral and transfer of patients to facilitate appropriate care for acute heart attack and stroke patients;

Evidence based prehospital care protocols for emergency medical services providers to assess, treat and transport stroke and acute heart attack patients. The office of emergency medical services shall work in coordination with licensed emergency medical providers in developing the protocols which shall include:

Plans for the triage and transport of stroke patients to the closest comprehensive or primary stroke center or, when appropriate, to an acute stroke ready center;

Plans for the triage and transport of acute heart attack patients to the closest receiving or referring center within a specified time after a patients report of symptoms.

History.

2013 ch. 109, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 170, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), added “as any one (1) or more of the following”, in (a)(iii), deleted “and” at the end, and added (v).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), added “as any one (1) or more of the following”, in (a)(iii), deleted “and” at the end, and added (v).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 109, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2013.